Utah statutes.
16-10a-121.   Forms.

(1)  The division may prescribe, and if so prescribed shall furnish on request, forms or cover sheets for documents required or permitted to be filed by this chapter as the division may determine to be appropriate.

(2)  However:

(a)  the use of any forms or cover sheets is not mandatory unless the division specifically requires their use; and

(b)  no requirement that a form or cover sheet be used precludes in any way the inclusion in any document of any item which is not prohibited to be included by this chapter, nor does it require the inclusion with the filed document of any item which is not otherwise required by this chapter.

